test/src/gt-desc-yamls/pronoun-gt-desc.ana.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-desc.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-desc.xfst
    App: lookup


# Comments after each pronoun:
# ok = checked against
# ? = not checked

# Pronouns belonging to MUNLEX, DAKKAR, IESLEX, GUHTEMUSLEX, MIIINTERLEX, indef-a-uneven, indef-a-uneven-gahpir, indef-a-uneven, oblintercas_indef, indefdeclpleven

Tests:
  Pron - mun: # MUNLEX
	mun+Pron+Pers+Sg1+Ill: munnje
	mun+Pron+Pers+Sg1+Ess: munin
	mun+Pron+Pers+Du1+Acc: munno
    mun+Pron+Pers+Du1+Loc: munnos
    mun+Pron+Pers+Pl1+Ill: midjiide
    mun+Pron+Pers+Pl1+Ill+Err/Orth: [minsii, minsiidda]
    mun+Pron+Pers+Pl1+Com: minguin
    mun+Pron+Pers+Pl1+Com+Err/Orth: miiguin
    
  Pron - duokkár: # DAKKAR
	duokkár+Pron+Dem+Attr: duokkár
	duokkár+Pron+Dem+Sg+Loc: duokkáris
	duokkár+Pron+Dem+Pl+Nom: duokkárat
	duokkár+Pron+Dem+Pl+Com: duokkáriiguin
	
  Pron - ieš: # IESLEX
    ieš+Pron+Refl+Sg+Nom: ieš
    ieš+Pron+Refl+Gen+PxPl2: [iežadet, iežaideattet]
    ieš+Pron+Refl+Gen+Err/Orth+PxPl2: iezadet
    ieš+Pron+Refl+Ill+PxSg3: [alccesis, allasis, alccis, alcces, alcceska]
    ieš+Pron+Refl+Ill+PxDu3: [alcceseaskka, allaseaskka, alcciska]
    ieš+Pron+Refl+Ill+PxDu3+Err/Orth: [allaseaska, alcciskka, alcceskka, alcceseaska]
   	ieš+Pron+Refl+Loc+PxPl1: [alddiineamet, alddámet, alddáneamet, alddesteamet]
   	ieš+Pron+Refl+Loc+Err/Orth+PxPl1: [alddimet, alddineamet]
	ieš+Pron+Refl+Com+PxPl3: iežaineaset
	
  Pron - guhtemuš: # GUHTEMUSLEX
	guhtemuš+Pron+Rel+Sg+Nom: [guhtemuš, guđemuš]
	guhtemuš+Pron+Rel+Sg+Gen: guđemučča
	guhtemuš+Pron+Rel+Ess: guđemužžan
	guhtemuš+Pron+Rel+Pl+Ill: guđemuččaide
	
  Pron - mihkkege: # MIIINTERLEX
	mihkkege+v1+Pron+Indef+Sg+Nom: mihkkege
	mihkkege+v2+Pron+Indef+Sg+Nom: mihkkige
	mihkkege+Pron+Indef+Sg+Nom+Err/Orth: mihkket
	mihkkege+v1+Pron+Indef+Sg+Gen: mange
    mihkkege+v2+Pron+Indef+Sg+Gen: mange
	mihkkege+v1+Pron+Indef+Sg+Acc: [maidege, mange]
    mihkkege+v2+Pron+Indef+Sg+Acc: [maidige, mange]
	mihkkege+v1+Pron+Indef+Sg+Loc: [mastege, masge]
	mihkkege+v2+Pron+Indef+Sg+Loc: [mastige, masge]
	mihkkege+v1+Pron+Indef+Pl+Nom: [mahkkege, mahttege]
    mihkkege+v2+Pron+Indef+Pl+Nom: [mahkkige, mahttige]

  Pron - eanas: # indef-a-uneven
  	eanas+Pron+Indef+Sg+Nom: eanas
  	eanas+Pron+Indef+Sg+Loc: eatnasis
	eanas+Pron+Indef+Pl+Gen: eatnasiid
	eanas+Pron+Indef+Pl+Com: eatnasiiguin
	
  Pron - veaháš: # indef-a-uneven-gahpir
  	veaháš+Pron+Indef+Sg+Nom: veaháš
  	veaháš+Pron+Indef+Err/Orth+Sg+Nom: veahaš
  	veaháš+Pron+Indef+Sg+Loc: veahážis
  	veaháš+Pron+Indef+Err/Orth+Sg+Loc: veahažis
	veaháš+Pron+Indef+Pl+Gen: veahážiid
	veaháš+Pron+Indef+Err/Orth+Pl+Gen: veahažiid
	veaháš+Pron+Indef+Pl+Com: veahážiiguin
	veaháš+Pron+Indef+Err/Orth+Pl+Com: veahažiiguin
	
  Pron - juobbá: # indef-a-uneven
  	juobbá+Pron+Indef+Sg+Nom: juobbá
  	juobbá+Pron+Indef+Sg+Loc: juoppás
	juobbá+Pron+Indef+Pl+Gen: juoppáid
	juobbá+Pron+Indef+Pl+Com: juoppáiguin

  Pron - juogamii: # oblintercas_indef
  	juogamii+Pron+Indef+Sg+Nom: juogamii
  	juogamii+Pron+Indef+Sg+Loc: juogamas
	juogamii+Pron+Indef+Pl+Gen: juogamaid
	juogamii+Pron+Indef+Pl+Com: juogamaiguin

  Pron - buotdivnnat: # indefdeclpleven
  	buotdivnnat+Pron+Indef+Pl+Nom: buotdivnnat
  	buotdivnnat+Pron+Indef+Pl+Loc: buotdivnnain
	buotdivnnat+Pron+Indef+Pl+Gen: buotdivnnaid
	buotdivnnat+Pron+Indef+Pl+Com: buotdivnnaiguin
